Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7686.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 23-17.30 of the General Laws entitled "Primary Care Training Sites
Program" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
23-17.30-8. Appropriation of funds.
(a) For the fiscal year 2026 and thereafter, the State of Rhode Island shall appropriate the
sum of two million seven hundred thousand dollars ($2,700,000) to the primary care training sites
program for the purpose of supporting its training for physicians, nurse practitioners and physician
assistants, established pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.
(b) The funds appropriated under this section shall be administered by the department of
health.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
========
LC005250
========